South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S854.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-6540(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) A violation of this article is not negligence per se or contributory negligence, and is not admissible as evidence in a civil action if the violation is a proximate cause of the claimed damages. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----